Utah statutes.
26-23-6.   Criminal and civil penalties and liability for violations.

(1) (a)  Any person, association, or corporation, or the officers of any of them, who violates any provision of this chapter or lawful orders of the department or a local health department in a criminal proceeding is guilty of a class B misdemeanor for the first violation, and for  any subsequent similar violation within two years, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor, except this section does not establish the criminal penalty for violation of Section 26-23-5.5.

(b)  Conviction in a criminal proceeding does not preclude the department or a local health department from assessment of any civil penalty, administrative civil money penalty or to deny, revoke, condition, or refuse to renew a permit, license, or certificate or to seek other injunctive or equitable remedies.

(2)  Any person, association, or corporation, or the officers of any of them, who violates any provision of this title or lawful orders of the department or a local health department, or rules adopted under this title by the department:

(a)  shall be assessed, in a judicial civil proceeding, a penalty not to exceed the sum of $10,000 per violation; or

(b)  in an administrative action in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, or similar procedures adopted by local or county government, a penalty not to exceed the sum of $10,000 per violation.

(3)  Assessment of any civil penalty or administrative penalty does not preclude the department or a local health department from seeking criminal penalties or to deny, revoke, impose conditions on, or refuse to renew a permit, license, or certificate or to seek other injunctive or equitable remedies.

(4)  In addition to any penalties imposed under Subsection (1), the person, association, or corporation, or the officers of any of them is liable for any expense incurred by the department in removing or abating any health or sanitation violations, including any nuisance, source of filth, cause of sickness, or dead animal.

(5)  Each day of violation of a provision of this title, lawful orders of the department or a local health department, or rules adopted by the department under it is a separate violation.



Amended by Chapter 347, 2009 General Session

